Hawaii statutes.
§89-14 Prevention of prohibited practices.
Any controversy concerning prohibited practices may be submitted to the board
in the same manner and with the same effect as provided in section 377-9;
provided that the board shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over such a
controversy except that nothing herein shall preclude (1) the institution of
appropriate proceedings in circuit court pursuant to section [89-12(c)] or (2)
the judicial review of decisions or orders of the board in prohibited practice controversies
in accordance with section 377-9 and chapter 91. All references in section
377-9 to "labor organization" shall include employee organization. [L
1970, c 171, pt of §2; am L 1982, c 27, §1; am L 1985, c 251, §6]

Case Notes

The Hawaii labor
relations board (HLRB) had exclusive original jurisdiction over the statutory
issues raised in public employees' union's complaint, and the circuit court
erred in addressing the constitutional issues without first giving the HLRB the
opportunity to address the issues arising under this chapter. 124 H. 197, 239
P.3d 1.

Circuit court erred by failing to allow the Hawaii labor
relations board to decide the issues relating to chapter 89 before deciding the
constitutional issues in the case where the plain language of this section supported
the conclusion that the board had exclusive original jurisdiction over the
plaintiffs' claims and that the case was a "controversy concerning
prohibited practices" that must first be submitted to the board. 126 H.
318, 271 P.3d 613.

An action concerning
prohibited practices may be brought before the board or in a court of competent
jurisdiction. 2 H. App. 50, 625 P.2d 1046.

Granting the labor relations board exclusive original
jurisdiction over plaintiff's action under this section did not violate
plaintiff's equal protection right; as plaintiff's fundamental right was not
implicated, and plaintiff did not argue that public employees were a suspect
class, the board's exclusive original jurisdiction over public sector prohibited
practice controversies was rationally related to the public policy of chapter
89. 125 H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d 1135.

Granting the labor relations board exclusive original
jurisdiction over plaintiff's action under this section did not violate plaintiff's
substantive due process rights; as plaintiff's fundamental right was not
implicated, granting the board exclusive original jurisdiction over public
sector prohibited practice controversies was rationally related to the public
policy of chapter 89 - that it would be more effective in promoting harmonious
governmental employer-employee relations and assuring the effective operation
of government for these controversies to be first decided by the board rather
than the courts. 125 H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d 1135.

The labor relations board had exclusive original
jurisdiction, pursuant to this section, over plaintiff's hybrid-action
complaint involving prohibited practices where plaintiff's complaint alleged
that the State had breached the collective bargaining agreement (CBA) and its
duty of good faith and fair dealing, and that the United Public Workers, as
plaintiff's exclusive representative under the CBA, had breached its duty of
fair representation in violation of §89-8(a). 125 H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d
1135.

This section, by vesting the labor relations board with
exclusive original jurisdiction over plaintiff's action, did not violate the
First Amendment of the U.S. Constitution, as the administrative dispute
resolution process set forth in chapter 89 did not preclude plaintiff from
seeking redress from the courts; plaintiff could appeal an unfavorable decision
issued by the board to the circuit court and was thus not deprived of
reasonable access to the courts. 125 H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d 1135.

This section did not violate plaintiff's procedural due
process rights where: (1) chapter 89 afforded plaintiff the opportunity to
present plaintiff's action to the labor relations board in an administrative
hearing; (2) the decision of the board required a majority vote of its three
members, and one member each must be representative of management, labor, and
the public; and (3) any person aggrieved by a decision of the board could
appeal that decision to the circuit court. 125 H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d 1135.

The Hawaii labor relations board had jurisdiction to declare
whether the factual circumstances presented to it in the union's amended
petition would constitute a prohibited practice where the amended petition
sought a declaratory ruling that the employers' service of subpoenas duces
tecum interfered with, restrained, and otherwise violated the employees' rights
under §89-3, and therefore constituted prohibited practices pursuant to
§89-13(a)(1). 131 H. 142 (App.), 315 P.3d 768 (2013).

Where the government-employee union's (union) claim that the
government employers violated the terms of the arbitration award by failing to
meet and confer as required by the arbitration award involved a controversy
concerning prohibited practices, the Hawaii labor relations board had exclusive
original jurisdiction over the claims raised in the union's motion for civil
contempt, and the circuit court lacked jurisdiction to decide the motion for
civil contempt. 132 H. 492 (App.), 323 P.3d 136 (2014).

Where the parties' claims regarding their dispute over the
selection of a neutral arbitrator, as alleged in their prohibited practice
complaints, clearly involved a controversy concerning prohibited practices, the
Hawaii labor relations board had exclusive original jurisdiction to determine
the controversy concerning the selection of the neutral arbitrator. 132 H. 492
(App.), 323 P.3d 136 (2014).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next